Missouri, session 2026, SB992.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 135.714, 160.410, 160.518, 160.522,
160.526, 160.570, 160.720, 161.670, 161.855, 161.1085,
161.1090, 161.1100, 162.1300, 163.023, 167.905, 168.749, and
170.017, RSMo, are repealed and seventeen new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 135.714, 160.410,
160.518, 160.522, 160.526, 160.570, 160.720, 161.670, 161.855,
161.1085, 161.1090, 161.1100, 162.1300, 163.023, 167.905,
168.749, and 170.017, to read as follows:
135.714. 1. Each educational assistance organization
shall:
(1) Notify the state treasurer of such organization's
intent to provide scholarship accounts to qualified students;
(2) Demonstrate to the state treasurer that such
organization is exempt from federal income tax under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(3) Provide a state treasurer-approved receipt to
taxpayers for contributions made to the organization;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 992 2
(4) Ensure that grants are distributed to scholarship
accounts of qualified students in the following order:
(a) Qualified students who received a scholarship
grant in the previous school year;
(b) Qualified students who are siblings of qualified
students who will receive a scholarship grant in the current
school year;
(c) Qualified students that have an approved
"individualized education plan" (IEP) developed under the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),
20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, or who have
been diagnosed with dyslexia, as the term "dyslexia" is
defined in section 633.420;
(d) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch
as approved by the department of elementary and secondary
education in accordance with federal regulations and who
reside in an unaccredited or provisionally accredited school
district;
(e) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced
price lunch as approved by the department of elementary and
secondary education in accordance with federal regulations
and who reside in an unaccredited or provisionally
accredited school district;
(f) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch
as approved by the department of elementary and secondary
education in accordance with federal regulations;
(g) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced
price lunch as approved by the department of elementary and
secondary education in accordance with federal regulations;
(h) Qualified students who are active duty military
dependents who have relocated to Missouri and are enrolling
in a school in the state for the first time; and

SB 992 3
(i) All other qualified students;
(5) Ensure that:
(a) One hundred percent of such organization's
revenues from interest or investments is spent on
scholarship accounts;
(b) At least ninety percent of such organization's
revenues from qualifying contributions is spent on
scholarship accounts; and
(c) Marketing and administrative expenses do not
exceed the following limits of such organization's remaining
revenue from contributions:
a. Ten percent for the first two hundred fifty
thousand dollars;
b. Eight percent for the next five hundred thousand
dollars; and
c. Three percent thereafter;
(6) (a) Distribute scholarship account payments
either four times per year or in a single lump sum at the
beginning of the year as requested by the parent of a
qualified student, based on the state adequacy target as
defined in section 163.011 and calculated by the department
of elementary and secondary education, subject to the
following total grant amount limits:
a. For a qualified student who meets the criteria to
be included in a school district's limited English
proficiency pupil count as set forth in subdivision (8) of
section 163.011, not more than one hundred sixty percent of
the state adequacy target;
b. For a qualified student who is eligible for free or
reduced price lunch as approved by the department of
elementary and secondary education in accordance with

SB 992 4
federal regulations, not more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state adequacy target;
c. For a qualified student who has an approved
individualized education plan developed under the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20
U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, not more than one
hundred seventy-five percent of the state adequacy target;
and
d. For all other qualified students, not more than the
state adequacy target;
(b) Scholarship account payments distributed under
this subdivision shall be in the form of a deposit into the
scholarship account of the qualified student;
(7) Provide the state treasurer, upon request, with
criminal background checks on all such organization's
employees and board members and exclude from employment or
governance any individual who might reasonably pose a risk
to the appropriate use of contributed funds;
(8) Demonstrate such organization's financial
accountability by:
(a) Submitting to the state treasurer annual audit
financial statements by a certified public accountant within
six months of the end of the educational assistance
organization's fiscal year; and
(b) Having an auditor certify that the report is free
of material misstatements; and
(9) Ensure that participating students take [the state
100 achievement tests or] nationally norm-referenced tests that
101 measure learning gains in math and English language arts[,
102 and provide for value-added assessment, in grades that
103 require testing under the statewide assessment system set
104 forth in section 160.518];

SB 992 5
105 (10) Allow costs of the testing requirements to be
106 covered by the scholarships distributed by the educational
107 assistance organization;
108 (11) Provide the parents of each student who was
109 tested with a copy of the results of the tests on an annual
110 basis, beginning with the first year of testing;
111 (12) Provide the test results to the state treasurer,
112 the department of elementary and secondary education, and
113 the board established in section 135.715 on an annual basis,
114 beginning with the first year of testing;
115 (13) Report student information that would allow the
116 state treasurer, the department of elementary and secondary
117 education, and the board established in section 135.715 to
118 aggregate data by grade level, gender, family income level,
119 and race;
120 (14) Provide rates of high school graduation, college
121 attendance, and college graduation for participating
122 students to the state treasurer, the department of
123 elementary and secondary education, and the board
124 established in section 135.715 in a manner consistent with
125 nationally recognized standards;
126 (15) Provide to the state treasurer, the department of
127 elementary and secondary education, and the board
128 established in section 135.715 the results from an annual
129 parental satisfaction survey, including information about
130 the number of years that the parent's child has participated
131 in the scholarship program. The annual satisfaction survey
132 shall ask parents of scholarship students to express:
133 (a) Their level of satisfaction with the child's
134 academic achievement, including academic achievement at the
135 schools the child attends through the scholarship program

SB 992 6
136 versus academic achievement at the school previously
137 attended;
138 (b) Their level of satisfaction with school safety at
139 the schools the child attends through the scholarship
140 program versus safety at the schools previously attended;
141 (16) Demonstrate such organization's financial
142 viability, if such organization is to receive donations of
143 fifty thousand dollars or more during the school year, by
144 filing with the state treasurer before the start of the
145 school year a surety bond payable to the state in an amount
146 equal to the aggregate amount of contributions expected to
147 be received during the school year or other financial
148 information that demonstrates the financial viability of the
149 educational assistance organization.
150 2. The annual audit required under this section shall
151 include:
152 (1) The name and address of the educational assistance
153 organization;
154 (2) The name and address of each qualified student for
155 whom a parent opened a scholarship account with the
156 organization;
157 (3) The total number and total dollar amount of
158 contributions received during the previous calendar year; and
159 (4) The total number and total dollar amount of
160 scholarship accounts opened during the previous calendar
161 year.
162 3. The state treasurer shall:
163 (1) Ensure compliance with all student privacy laws
164 for data in the state treasurer's possession;
165 (2) Collect all test results;
166 (3) Provide the test results and associated learning
167 gains to the public via a state website after the third year

SB 992 7
168 of test and test-related data collection. The findings
169 shall be aggregated by the students' grade level, gender,
170 family income level, number of years of participation in the
171 scholarship program, and race; and
172 (4) Provide graduation rates to the public via a state
173 website after the third year of test and test-related data
174 collection.
175 4. The state treasurer shall cause the following
176 information to be posted on the state treasurer's website
177 annually, provided that no personally identifiable
178 information of any student is released:
179 (1) The number of students who have been awarded a
180 scholarship to date and the number of students who have been
181 awarded a scholarship in the current school year;
182 (2) The number of scholarship recipients enrolled in
183 each qualified school, along with the number of recipients
184 who qualify for free and reduced price lunch and the number
185 of recipients who receive special education services and the
186 type of special education services received. Such
187 information shall be broken down by school year and the
188 total to date;
189 (3) The total number of scholarship recipients who are
190 eligible for free and reduced price lunch as approved by the
191 department of elementary and secondary education in
192 accordance with federal guidelines, broken down by school
193 year and the total to date;
194 (4) The total number of scholarship recipients who
195 have an individualized education plan (IEP) developed under
196 the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
197 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, broken down by
198 school year and the total to date;

SB 992 8
199 (5) The number of scholarship recipients who have
200 received a grant from each educational assistance
201 organization, broken down by school year and the total to
202 date;
203 (6) The student test scores required to be posted
204 online pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of this
205 section;
206 (7) The results of the parent satisfaction survey
207 required annually pursuant to subdivision (15) of subsection
208 1 of this section;
209 (8) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant
210 for all students who participate in the program;
211 (9) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant
212 for all students who participate in the program and who have
213 an IEP;
214 (10) The average duration of a student's participation
215 in the program;
216 (11) The number of students who are in their first
217 year of participation in the program;
218 (12) A list of the educational assistance
219 organizations that make contributions to the empowerment
220 scholarship accounts of students enrolled in each qualified
221 school; and
222 (13) The total amount of money that has been remitted
223 from qualified students' empowerment scholarship accounts to
224 each qualified school, broken down by school year and the
225 total aggregate amount.
226 5. An educational assistance organization may contract
227 with private financial management firms to manage
228 scholarship accounts with the supervision of the state
229 treasurer, provided that all laws and regulations that apply
230 to employees of such educational assistance organization

SB 992 9
231 shall also apply to the actions of any employees of the
232 management firm while they are conducting work relating to
233 the direct decision-making of the operation of such
234 educational assistance organization.
160.410. 1. A charter school shall enroll:
(1) All pupils resident in the district in which it
operates;
(2) Nonresident pupils eligible to attend a district's
school under an urban voluntary transfer program;
(3) Nonresident pupils who transfer from an
unaccredited district under section 167.895, provided that
the charter school is an approved charter school, as defined
in section 167.895, and subject to all other provisions of
section 167.895;
(4) In the case of a charter school whose mission
includes student drop-out prevention or recovery, any
nonresident pupil from the same or an adjacent county who
resides in a residential care facility, a transitional
living group home, or an independent living program whose
last school of enrollment is in the school district where
the charter school is established, who submits a timely
application; and
(5) In the case of a workplace charter school, any
student eligible to attend under subdivision (1) or (2) of
this subsection whose parent is employed in the business
district, who submits a timely application, unless the
number of applications exceeds the capacity of a program,
class, grade level or building. The configuration of a
business district shall be set forth in the charter and
shall not be construed to create an undue advantage for a
single employer or small number of employers.

SB 992 10
2. If capacity is insufficient to enroll all pupils
who submit a timely application, the charter school shall
have an admissions process that assures all applicants of an
equal chance of gaining admission and does not discriminate
based on parents' ability to pay fees or tuition except that:
(1) A charter school may establish a geographical area
around the school whose residents will receive a preference
for enrolling in the school, provided that such preferences
do not result in the establishment of racially or
socioeconomically isolated schools and provided such
preferences conform to policies and guidelines established
by the state board of education;
(2) A charter school may also give a preference for
admission of children whose siblings attend the school or
whose parents are employed at the school or in the case of a
workplace charter school, a child whose parent is employed
in the business district or at the business site of such
school;
(3) Charter schools may also give a preference for
admission to high-risk students, as defined in subdivision
(5) of subsection 2 of section 160.405, when the school
targets these students through its proposed mission,
curriculum, teaching methods, and services;
(4) A charter school may also give a preference for
admission to students who will be eligible for the free and
reduced price lunch program in the upcoming school year.
3. A charter school shall not limit admission based on
race, ethnicity, national origin, disability, income level,
except as allowed under subdivision (4) of subsection 2 of
this section, proficiency in the English language or
athletic ability, but may limit admission to pupils within a
given age group or grade level. Charter schools may limit

SB 992 11
admission based on gender only when the school is a single-
gender school. Students of a charter school who have been
enrolled for a full academic year shall be counted in the
performance of the charter school on [the statewide
assessments] nationally norm-referenced assessments in that
calendar year, unless otherwise exempted as English language
learners. [For purposes of this subsection, "full academic
year" means the last Wednesday in September through the
administration of the Missouri assessment program test
without transferring out of the school and re-enrolling.]
4. A charter school shall make available for public
inspection, and provide upon request, to the parent,
guardian, or other custodian of any school-age pupil
resident in the district in which the school is located the
following information:
(1) The school's charter;
(2) The school's most recent annual report card
published according to section 160.522;
(3) The results of background checks on the charter
school's board members; and
(4) If a charter school is operated by a management
company, a copy of the written contract between the
governing board of the charter school and the educational
management organization or the charter management
organization for services. The charter school may charge
reasonable fees, not to exceed the rate specified in section
610.026 for furnishing copies of documents under this
subsection.
5. When a student attending a charter school who is a
resident of the school district in which the charter school
is located moves out of the boundaries of such school
district, the student may complete the current semester and

SB 992 12
shall be considered a resident student. The student's
parent or legal guardian shall be responsible for the
student's transportation to and from the charter school.
6. If a change in school district boundary lines
occurs under section 162.223, 162.431, 162.441, or 162.451,
or by action of the state board of education under section
162.081, including attachment of a school district's
territory to another district or dissolution, such that a
100 student attending a charter school prior to such change no
101 longer resides in a school district in which the charter
102 school is located, then the student may complete the current
103 academic year at the charter school. The student shall be
104 considered a resident student. The student's parent or
105 legal guardian shall be responsible for the student's
106 transportation to and from the charter school.
107 7. The provisions of sections 167.018 and 167.019
108 concerning foster children's educational rights are
109 applicable to charter schools.
160.518. 1. (1) Consistent with the provisions
contained in section 160.526, the state board of education
shall [develop, modify, and revise, as necessary, a
statewide assessment system that provides maximum
flexibility for local school districts to] ensure that local
school districts test students' academic achievement using
nationally norm-referenced assessments that determine the
degree to which students in the public schools of the state
are proficient in the knowledge, skills, and competencies
adopted by such board pursuant to section 160.514.
(2) (a) [The statewide assessment system] Such
nationally norm-referenced assessments shall assess problem
solving, analytical ability, evaluation, creativity, and
application ability in the different content areas and shall

SB 992 13
be performance-based to identify what students know, as well
as what they are able to do, and shall enable teachers to
evaluate actual academic performance.
(b) The [statewide assessment system] nationally norm-
referenced assessments shall neither promote nor prohibit
rote memorization and shall not include existing versions of
tests approved for use pursuant to the provisions of section
160.257, nor enhanced versions of such tests.
(3) [After the state board of education adopts and
implements academic performance standards as required under
section 161.855, the state board of education shall develop
and adopt a standardized assessment instrument under this
section based on the academic performance standards adopted
under section 161.855.
(4)] The [statewide assessment system] nationally norm-
referenced assessments shall measure, where appropriate by
grade level, a student's knowledge of academic subjects
including, but not limited to, reading skills, writing
skills, mathematics skills, world and American history,
forms of government, geography and science.
2. [The statewide assessment system shall only permit
the academic performance of students in each school in the
state to be tracked against prior academic performance in
the same school.
3. (1) The state board of education shall suggest,
but not mandate, criteria for a school to demonstrate that
its students learn the knowledge, skills and competencies at
exemplary levels worthy of imitation by students in other
schools in the state and nation.
(2) Exemplary levels shall be measured by the
statewide assessment system developed pursuant to subsection
1 of this section, or until said statewide assessment system

SB 992 14
is available, by indicators approved for such use by the
state board of education.
(3) The provisions of other law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the commissioner of education may, upon
request of the school district, present a plan for the
waiver of rules and regulations to any such school, to be
known as "Outstanding Schools Waivers", consistent with the
provisions of subsection 4 of this section.
4. (1) For any school that meets the criteria
established by the state board of education for three
successive school years pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 3 of this section, by August first following the
third such school year, the commissioner of education shall
present a plan to the superintendent of the school district
in which such school is located for the waiver of rules and
regulations to promote flexibility in the operations of the
school and to enhance and encourage efficiency in the
delivery of instructional services.
(2) The provisions of other law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the plan presented to the superintendent
shall provide a summary waiver, with no conditions, for the
pupil testing requirements pursuant to section 160.257, in
the school.
(3) Further, the provisions of other law to the
contrary notwithstanding, the plan shall detail a means for
the waiver of requirements otherwise imposed on the school
related to the authority of the state board of education to
classify school districts pursuant to subdivision (9) of
section 161.092 and such other rules and regulations as
determined by the commissioner of education, excepting such
waivers shall be confined to the school and not other
schools in the district unless such other schools meet the

SB 992 15
criteria established by the state board of education
consistent with subsection 3 of this section and the waivers
shall not include the requirements contained in this section
and section 160.514.
(4) Any waiver provided to any school as outlined in
this subsection shall be void on June thirtieth of any
school year in which the school fails to meet the criteria
established by the state board of education consistent with
subsection 3 of this section.
5.] The score on any assessment test [developed]
conducted pursuant to this section or this chapter of any
student for whom English is a second language shall not be
counted until such time as such student has been educated
for three full school years in a school in this state, or in
any other state, in which English is the primary language.
[6.] 3. (1) (a) The state board of education shall
identify or, if necessary, establish one or more
developmentally appropriate alternate assessments for
students who receive special educational services, as that
term is defined pursuant to section 162.675.
(b) In the development of such alternate assessments,
100 the state board shall establish an advisory panel consisting
101 of a majority of active special education teachers residing
102 in Missouri and other education professionals as appropriate
103 to research available assessment options.
104 (c) The advisory panel shall attempt to identify
105 preexisting developmentally appropriate alternate
106 assessments but shall, if necessary, develop alternate
107 assessments and recommend one or more alternate assessments
108 for adoption by the state board.

SB 992 16
109 (d) The state board shall consider the recommendations
110 of the advisory council in identifying or, if necessary,
111 establishing such alternate assessment or assessments.
112 (2) Any student who receives special educational
113 services, as that term is defined pursuant to section
114 162.675, shall be assessed by an alternate assessment
115 established pursuant to this subsection upon a determination
116 by the student's individualized education program team that
117 such alternate assessment is more appropriate to assess the
118 student's knowledge, skills and competencies than the
119 assessment developed pursuant to subsection 1 of this
120 section.
121 (3) The alternate assessment shall evaluate the
122 student's independent living skills, which include how
123 effectively the student addresses common life demands and
124 how well the student meets standards for personal
125 independence expected for someone in the student's age
126 group, sociocultural background, and community setting.
127 [7.] 4. The state board of education shall also
128 develop recommendations regarding alternate assessments for
129 any military dependent who relocates to Missouri after the
130 commencement of a school term, in order to accommodate such
131 student while ensuring that he or she is proficient in the
132 knowledge, skills, and competencies adopted under section
133 160.514.
134 [8.] 5. (1) As used in this subsection, the following
135 terms mean:
136 (a) "Department", the department of elementary and
137 secondary education;
138 (b) "Grade-level equivalence", a metric developed for
139 grades three to eight and used by the department to show a
140 student's proximity to doing grade-level work;

SB 992 17
141 (c) "Parent", a parent, guardian, custodian, or other
142 person with authority to act on behalf of a student.
143 (2) Grade-level equivalence, as developed and used
144 under this subsection, shall consist of a student's
145 knowledge of academic subjects by grade level and
146 performance-level descriptors indicating whether such
147 student is ready for the next grade or level of education.
148 Such performance-level descriptors shall consist of the
149 following:
150 (a) Advanced, which shall indicate that such student:
151 a. Demonstrates superior performance on challenging
152 grade-level subject matter;
153 b. Is above such student's current grade or level of
154 education; and
155 c. Is ready for, at a minimum, the next grade or level
156 of education;
157 (b) Proficient, which shall indicate that such student:
158 a. Demonstrates mastery over all appropriate grade-
159 level standards and has introductory-level knowledge for the
160 next grade or level of education;
161 b. May be above such student's current grade or level
162 of education in some areas; and
163 c. Is ready for the next grade or level of education;
164 (c) Grade level, which shall indicate that such
165 student:
166 a. Demonstrates mastery over appropriate grade-level
167 subject matter;
168 b. Is at such student's current grade or level of
169 education; and
170 c. May be ready, with appropriate reinforcement, for
171 the next grade or level of education;
172 (d) Basic, which shall indicate that such student:

SB 992 18
173 a. Demonstrates partial mastery of the essential
174 knowledge and skills appropriate to such student's grade or
175 level of education;
176 b. May not be at such student's current grade or level
177 of education; and
178 c. May not be ready, without appropriate remediation,
179 for the next grade or level of education; and
180 (e) Below basic, which shall indicate that such
181 student:
182 a. Has failed to perform, at a minimum, at the limited
183 knowledge level necessary for such student's grade or level
184 of education;
185 b. Is not at such student's current grade or level of
186 education; and
187 c. Has been determined to be at the specific lower
188 grade or level of education measured by and listed in such
189 student's [statewide] nationally norm-referenced assessment
190 score.
191 (3) (a) Such grade-level equivalence shall be
192 determined at the same time each student's academic
193 performance is measured by the [statewide assessment system
194 developed] nationally norm-referenced assessment conducted
195 under this section.
196 (b) Such grade-level equivalence shall be provided at
197 the same time such student's [statewide] nationally norm-
198 referenced assessment score is reported to such student or
199 such student's parent.
200 (4) (a) Data related to grade-level equivalence shall
201 be searchable on a building-by-building, school-by-school,
202 district-by-district, and statewide basis on the
203 department's school accountability report card developed
204 under section 160.522.

SB 992 19
205 (b) Data related to grade-level equivalence shall
206 display the percentage of students whose performance-level
207 descriptor is grade level or above on a building-by-
208 building, school-by-school, district-by-district, and
209 statewide basis.
210 (c) No data related to grade-level equivalence shall
211 be disclosed in any form that allows the personal
212 identification of any student to any individual or entity
213 except such student or such student's parent.
214 (5) The provisions of subsection 2 of section 160.514
215 shall not apply to the development of the grade-level
216 equivalence metric.
217 (6) The department may choose a third-party nonprofit
218 entity to develop the grade-level equivalence metric.
160.522. 1. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall produce or cause to be produced,
at least annually, a school accountability report card for
each public school district, each public school building in
a school district, and each charter school in the state.
The report card shall be designed to satisfy state and
federal requirements for the disclosure of statistics about
students, staff, finances, academic achievement, and other
indicators. The purpose of the report card shall be to
provide educational statistics and accountability
information for parents, taxpayers, school personnel,
legislators, and the print and broadcast news media in a
standardized, easily accessible form.
2. (1) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop a standard form for the school
accountability report card.

SB 992 20
(2) The information reported shall include, but not be
limited to, the following information reported by each
school district or charter school:
(a) The most recent accreditation rating;
(b) Enrollment;
(c) Rates of pupil attendance;
(d) High school dropout rate and graduation rate;
(e) The number and rate of suspensions of ten days or
longer and expulsions of pupils;
(f) The district or charter school ratio of students
to administrators and students to classroom teachers;
(g) The average years of experience of professional
staff and advanced degrees earned;
(h) Student achievement and grade-level equivalence
data as measured through the [statewide assessment system
developed] nationally norm-referenced assessments conducted
pursuant to section 160.518;
(i) Student scores on the ACT, along with the
percentage of graduates taking the test;
(j) Average teachers' and administrators' salaries
compared to the state averages;
(k) Average per-pupil current expenditures for the
district or charter school as a whole and by attendance
center as reported to the department of elementary and
secondary education;
(l) The adjusted tax rate of the district or charter
school;
(m) The assessed valuation of the district;
(n) The percentage of the district or charter school
operating budget received from state, federal, and local
sources;

SB 992 21
(o) The percentage of students eligible for free or
reduced-price lunch;
(p) Data on the percentage of students continuing
their education in postsecondary programs;
(q) Information about the job placement rate for
students who complete district or charter school vocational
education programs;
(r) Whether the school district or charter school
currently has a state-approved gifted education program; and
(s) The percentage and number of students who are
currently being served in the district's or charter school's
state-approved gifted education program.
3. The report card shall permit the disclosure of data
on a school-by-school basis, but the reporting shall not be
personally identifiable to any student or education
professional in the state.
4. The report card shall identify each school or
attendance center that has been identified as a priority
school under sections 160.720 and 161.092. The report also
shall identify attendance centers that have been categorized
under federal law as needing improvement or requiring
specific school improvement strategies.
5. The report card shall not limit or discourage other
methods of public reporting and accountability by local
school districts. Districts shall provide information
included in the report card to parents, community members,
the print and broadcast news media, and legislators by
December first annually or as soon thereafter as the
information is available to the district, giving preference
to methods that incorporate the reporting into substantive
official communications such as student report cards. The
school district shall provide a printed copy of the district-

SB 992 22
level or school-level report card to any patron upon request
and shall make reasonable efforts to supply businesses such
as, but not limited to, real estate and employment firms
with copies or other information about the reports so that
parents and businesses from outside the district who may be
contemplating relocation have access.
6. For purposes of completing and distributing the
annual report card as prescribed in this section, a school
district may include the data from a charter school located
within such school district, provided the local board of
education or special administrative board for such district
and the charter school reach mutual agreement for the
inclusion of the data from the charter school and the terms
of such agreement are approved by the state board of
education. The charter school shall not be required to be a
part of the local educational agency of such school district
and may maintain a separate local educational agency status.
160.526. 1. In establishing, evaluating, modifying,
and revising the academic performance standards and learning
standards authorized by section 160.514 [and the statewide
assessment system authorized by subsection 1 of section
160.518], the state board of education shall consider the
work that has been done by other states, recognized regional
and national experts, professional education discipline-
based associations, other professional education
associations, the work product from the department of higher
education and workforce development's curriculum alignment
initiative, or any other work in the public domain.
2. [The state board of education shall by contract
enlist the assistance of such national experts to receive
reports, advice and counsel on a regular basis pertaining to
the validity and reliability of the statewide assessment

SB 992 23
system. The reports from such experts shall be received by
the state board of education. Within six months prior to
implementation of or modification or revision to the
statewide assessment system, the commissioner of education
shall inform the president pro tempore of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives about the procedures
to implement, modify, or revise the statewide assessment
system, including a report related to the reliability and
validity of the assessment instruments, and the general
assembly may, within the next sixty legislative days, veto
such implementation, modification, or revision by concurrent
resolution adopted by majority vote of both the senate and
the house of representatives.
3.] The commissioner of education shall establish a
procedure for the state board of education to regularly
receive advice and counsel from professional educators at
all levels in the state, district boards of education,
parents, representatives from business and industry, the
general assembly, and labor and community leaders pertaining
to the implementation of sections 160.514 and 160.518. By
December 31, 2014, the commissioner of education shall
revise this procedure to allow the state board of education
to regularly receive advice and counsel from professional
educators at all levels in the state, district boards of
education, parents, representatives from business and
industry, the general assembly, and labor and community
leaders whenever the state board develops, evaluates,
modifies, or revises academic performance standards[,] or
learning standards[, or the statewide assessment system]
under [sections] section 160.514 [and 160.518]. The
procedure shall include, at a minimum, the appointment of ad
hoc committees.

SB 992 24
160.570. 1. Nothing in this section or section
105.1209 shall be construed to affect or limit any state
agency's authority regarding professional registration,
licensing or issuance of professional certificates, nor
shall this section be construed to limit or affect the
authority of the state board of education to examine
applicants and issue high school equivalency certificates.
2. The school board of each school district shall
establish a written policy on student participation in
[statewide] nationally norm-referenced assessments. The
policy shall be provided to each student and the parent,
guardian or other person responsible for every student under
eighteen years of age at the beginning of each school year
and a copy of the policy shall be maintained in the district
office and shall be available for viewing by the public
during business hours of the district office. A school
board may establish a policy designed to encourage students
to give their best efforts on each portion of any
[statewide] nationally norm-referenced assessment
established pursuant to section 160.518 which may include
but is not limited to incentives or supplementary work as a
consequence of performance.
3. In no case shall the state board of education or
any other state agency establish any single test or group of
tests as a condition or requirement for high school
graduation or as a requirement for a state-approved diploma.
160.720. 1. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall identify as a priority school any
school building or attendance center that fails to meet
acceptable standards of student achievement established by
the state board of education and based upon factors which
shall include, but not be limited to, student assessments,

SB 992 25
graduation rate, drop-out rate, school attendance rate,
graduate placement in college, vocational or technical
school, or high-wage employment and incidence of school
violence.
2. The board of education of any district that
contains a priority school shall submit a comprehensive
school improvement plan that provides for the following:
(1) Identification of the areas of academic deficiency
in student performance on the [statewide] nationally norm-
referenced assessment [established] conducted pursuant to
section 160.518 by disaggregating scores based upon school,
grade, academic content area and student demographic
subgroups, which shall include, but shall not be limited to,
race, ethnicity, disability status, migrant status, limited
English proficiency, and economic disadvantage;
(2) Implementation of research-based strategies to
assist the priority school in addressing the areas of
deficiency;
(3) Alignment of the priority school's curriculum to
address deficiencies in student achievement;
(4) Reallocation of district resources to address the
areas of academic deficiency, which shall include focusing
available funding on professional development in the areas
of deficiency; and
(5) Listing of all school buildings and attendance
centers declared to be priority schools in the district's
annual school accountability report distributed pursuant to
section 160.522.
3. The state board of education may appoint a team to
conduct an educational audit of any priority school to
determine the factors that have contributed to the lack of
student achievement and shall give audit priority to schools

SB 992 26
based upon failure to meet standards of student achievement
as established pursuant to this section.
(1) An audit team shall include an experienced teacher
and an experienced administrator from successful school
districts of comparable size and per-pupil funding. The
size of the audit team shall be based upon the size of the
school to be audited;
(2) The audit team shall report its findings to the
state board of education and the local board of education;
(3) The state board may require all or part of those
findings to be addressed in the comprehensive school
improvement plan required pursuant to this section.
4. Comprehensive school improvement plans shall be
evaluated based upon standards established pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section and upon the following time
lines:
(1) The comprehensive school improvement plan shall be
submitted to the department of elementary and secondary
education on or before August fifteenth following any school
year in which a school district building meets the criteria
established under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall review and identify areas of concern in the
plan within sixty days of receipt; and
(3) Changes to the plan shall be forwarded to the
department of elementary and secondary education within
sixty days of notice to the district of the areas of concern.
5. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall withhold funds authorized in section 163.031
from any school district that fails to submit a
comprehensive school improvement plan based upon the
standards and time lines established in this section.

SB 992 27
Withheld funds shall be released upon submission of a
comprehensive school improvement plan that meets the
established requirements.
6. Designation as a priority school and the
effectiveness of the school district in implementing the
comprehensive school improvement plan required under this
section shall be considered by the state board of education
in the school district's accreditation granted pursuant to
section 161.092.
7. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under this
section shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
161.670. 1. Notwithstanding any other law, prior to
July 1, 2007, the state board of education shall establish
the "Missouri Course Access and Virtual School Program" to
serve school-age students residing in the state. The
Missouri course access and virtual school program shall
offer nonclassroom-based instruction in a virtual setting
using technology, intranet, or internet methods of
communication. Any student under the age of twenty-one in
grades kindergarten through twelve who resides in this state
shall be eligible to enroll in the Missouri course access
and virtual school program pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section.
2. (1) For purposes of calculation and distribution
of state school aid, students enrolled in the Missouri
course access and virtual school program shall be included
in the student enrollment of the school district in which
the student is enrolled under the relevant provisions of
subsection 3 of this section for such enrollment. Student
attendance for full-time virtual program students shall only
be included in any district pupil attendance calculation

SB 992 28
under chapter 163 using current-year pupil attendance for
such full-time virtual program pupils. For the purpose of
calculating average daily attendance in full-time virtual
programs under this section, average daily attendance shall
be defined as the quotient or the sum of the quotients
obtained by dividing the total number of hours attended in a
term by enrolled pupils between the ages of five and twenty-
one by the actual number of hours that the program was in
session in that term, and the provisions of section 162.1250
shall not apply to such funding calculation. Such
calculation shall be generated by the virtual provider and
provided to the host district for submission to the
department of elementary and secondary education. Such
students may complete their instructional activities, as
defined in subsection 4 of this section, during any hour of
the day and during any day of the week. The hours attended
for each enrolled pupil shall be documented by the pupil's
weekly progress in the educational program according to a
process determined by the virtual program and published
annually in the virtual program's enrollment handbook or
policy. To the average daily attendance of the following
school term shall be added the full-time equivalent average
daily attendance of summer school students. In the case of
a host school district enrolling one or more full-time
virtual school students, such enrolling district shall, as
part of its monthly state allocation, receive no less under
the state aid calculation for such students than an amount
equal to the state adequacy target multiplied by the
weighted average daily attendance of such full-time
students. Students residing in Missouri and enrolled in a
full-time virtual school program operated by a public
institution of higher education in this state shall be

SB 992 29
counted for a state aid calculation by the department, and
the department shall pay, from funds dedicated to state
school aid payments made under section 163.031, to such
institution an amount equal to the state adequacy target
multiplied by the weighted average daily attendance of such
full-time students.
(2) The Missouri course access and virtual school
program shall report to the district of residence the
following information about each student served by the
Missouri course access and virtual school program: name,
address, eligibility for free or reduced-price lunch,
limited English proficiency status, special education needs,
and the number of courses in which the student is enrolled.
The Missouri course access and virtual school program shall
promptly notify the resident district when a student
discontinues enrollment. A "full-time equivalent student"
is a student who is enrolled in the instructional equivalent
of six credits per regular term. Each Missouri course
access and virtual school program course shall count as one
class and shall generate that portion of a full-time
equivalent that a comparable course offered by the school
district would generate.
(3) Pursuant to an education services plan and
collaborative agreement under subsection 3 of this section,
full-time equivalent students may be allowed to use a
physical location of the resident school district for all or
some portion of ongoing instructional activity, and the
enrollment plan shall provide for reimbursement of costs of
the resident district for providing such access pursuant to
rules promulgated under this section by the department.
(4) In no case shall more than the full-time
equivalency of a regular term of attendance for a single

SB 992 30
student be used to claim state aid. Full-time equivalent
student credit completed shall be reported to the department
of elementary and secondary education in the manner
prescribed by the department. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit students from enrolling in additional courses under
a separate agreement that includes terms for paying tuition
or course fees.
(5) A full-time virtual school program serving full-
time equivalent students shall be considered an attendance
center in the host school district and shall participate in
the [statewide assessment system] nationally norm-referenced
assessments as defined in section 160.518. The academic
performance of students enrolled in a full-time virtual
school program shall be assigned to the designated
attendance center of the full-time virtual school program
100 and shall be considered in like manner to other attendance
101 centers. The academic performance of any student who
102 disenrolls from a full-time virtual school program and
103 enrolls in a public school or charter school shall not be
104 used in determining the annual performance report score of
105 the attendance center or school district in which the
106 student enrolls for twelve months from the date of
107 enrollment.
108 (6) For the purposes of this section, a public
109 institution of higher education operating a full-time
110 virtual school program shall be subject to all requirements
111 applicable to a host school district with respect to its
112 full-time equivalent students.
113 3. (1) A student who resides in this state may enroll
114 in Missouri course access and virtual school program courses
115 of his or her choice as a part of the student's annual
116 course load each school year, with any costs associated with

SB 992 31
117 such course or courses to be paid by the school district or
118 charter school if:
119 (a) The student is enrolled full-time in a public
120 school, including any charter school; and
121 (b) Prior to enrolling in any Missouri course access
122 and virtual school program course, a student has received
123 approval from his or her school district or charter school
124 through the procedure described under subdivision (2) of
125 this subsection.
126 (2) Each school district or charter school shall adopt
127 a policy that delineates the process by which a student may
128 enroll in courses provided by the Missouri course access and
129 virtual school program that is substantially similar to the
130 typical process by which a district student would enroll in
131 courses offered by the school district and a charter school
132 student would enroll in courses offered by the charter
133 school. The policy may include consultation with the
134 school's counselor and may include parental notification or
135 authorization. The policy shall ensure that available
136 opportunities for in-person instruction are considered prior
137 to moving a student to virtual courses. The policy shall
138 allow for continuous enrollment throughout the school year.
139 If the school district or charter school disapproves a
140 student's request to enroll in a course or courses provided
141 by the Missouri course access and virtual school program,
142 the reason shall be provided in writing and it shall be for
143 good cause. Good cause justification to disapprove a
144 student's request for enrollment in a course shall be a
145 determination that doing so is not in the best educational
146 interest of the student, and shall be consistent with the
147 determination that would be made for such course request
148 under the process by which a district student would enroll

SB 992 32
149 in a similar course offered by the school district and a
150 charter school student would enroll in a similar course
151 offered by the charter school, except that the determination
152 may consider the suitability of virtual courses for the
153 student based on prior participation in virtual courses by
154 the student. Appeals of any course denials under this
155 subsection shall be considered under a policy that is
156 substantially similar to the typical process by which
157 appeals would be considered for a student seeking to enroll
158 in courses offered by the school district and a charter
159 school student seeking to enroll in courses offered by the
160 charter school.
161 (3) For students enrolled in any Missouri course
162 access and virtual school program course in which costs
163 associated with such course are to be paid by the school
164 district or charter school as described under this
165 subdivision, the school district or charter school shall pay
166 the content provider directly on a pro rata monthly basis
167 based on a student's completion of assignments and
168 assessments. If a student discontinues enrollment, the
169 district or charter school may stop making monthly payments
170 to the content provider. No school district or charter
171 school shall pay, for any one course for a student, more
172 than the market necessary costs but in no case shall pay
173 more than fourteen percent of the state adequacy target, as
174 defined under section 163.011, as calculated at the end of
175 the most recent school year for any single, year-long course
176 and no more than seven percent of the state adequacy target
177 as described above for any single semester equivalent course.
178 (4) (a) A student who lives in this state may enroll
179 in a virtual program of their choice as provided in this
180 subdivision, and the provisions of subdivisions (1) to (3)

SB 992 33
181 of this subsection shall not apply to such enrollment in a
182 full-time virtual program. Each host school district
183 operating a full-time virtual program under this section
184 shall adopt, operate and implement an enrollment policy as
185 specified by the provisions of this subdivision. The
186 student, the student's parent or guardian if the student is
187 not considered homeless, the virtual program, the host
188 district, and the resident district shall collaborate in
189 good faith to implement the enrollment policy regarding the
190 student's enrollment, and the resident school district and
191 the host school district may mutually agree that the
192 resident district shall offer or continue to offer services
193 for the student under an agreement that includes financial
194 terms for reimbursement by the host school district for the
195 necessary costs of the resident school district providing
196 such services. An enrollment policy specified under this
197 subsection shall:
198 a. Require a student's parent or guardian, if the
199 student is not considered homeless, to apply for enrollment
200 in a full-time virtual program directly with the virtual
201 program;
202 b. Specify timelines for timely participation by the
203 virtual program, the host district, and resident district;
204 provided that the resident district shall provide any
205 relevant information and input on the enrollment within ten
206 business days of notice from the virtual program of the
207 enrollment application;
208 c. Include a survey of the reasons for the student's
209 and parent's interests in participating in the virtual
210 program;

SB 992 34
211 d. Include consideration of available opportunities
212 for in-person instruction prior to enrolling a student in a
213 virtual program;
214 e. Evaluate requests for enrollment based on meeting
215 the needs for a student to be successful considering all
216 relevant factors;
217 f. Ensure that, for any enrolling student with a
218 covered disability, an individualized education program and
219 a related services agreement, in cases where such agreement
220 is needed, are created to provide all services required to
221 ensure a free and appropriate public education, including
222 financial terms for reimbursement by the host district for
223 the necessary costs of any virtual program, school district,
224 or public or private entity providing all or a portion of
225 such services;
226 g. Require the virtual program to determine whether an
227 enrolling student will be admitted, based on the enrollment
228 policy, in consideration of all relevant factors and provide
229 the basis for its determination and any service plan for the
230 student, in writing, to the student, the student's parent or
231 guardian, the host district, and the resident district; and
232 h. Provide a process for reviewing appeals of
233 decisions made under this subdivision.
234 (b) The department shall publish an annual report
235 based on the enrollments and enrollment surveys conducted
236 under this subdivision that provides data at the statewide
237 and district levels of sufficient detail to allow analysis
238 of trends regarding the reasons for participation in the
239 virtual program at the statewide and district levels;
240 provided that no such survey results will be published in a
241 manner that reveals individual student information. The
242 department shall also include, in the annual report, data at

SB 992 35
243 the statewide and district levels of sufficient detail to
244 allow detection and analysis of the racial, ethnic, and
245 socio-economic balance of virtual program participation
246 among schools and districts at the statewide and district
247 levels, provided that no such survey results will be
248 published in a manner that reveals individual student
249 information.
250 (5) In the case of a student who is a candidate for A+
251 tuition reimbursement and taking a virtual course under this
252 section, the school shall attribute no less than ninety-five
253 percent attendance to any such student who has completed
254 such virtual course.
255 (6) The Missouri course access and virtual school
256 program shall ensure that individual learning plans designed
257 by certified teachers and professional staff are developed
258 for all students enrolled in more than two full-time course
259 access program courses or a full-time virtual school.
260 (7) Virtual school programs shall monitor individual
261 student success and engagement of students enrolled in their
262 program and, for students enrolled in virtual courses on a
263 part-time basis, the virtual school program shall provide
264 regular student progress reports for each student at least
265 four times per school year to the school district or charter
266 school, provide the host school district and the resident
267 school district ongoing access to academic and other
268 relevant information on student success and engagement, and
269 shall terminate or alter the course offering if it is found
270 the course is not meeting the educational needs of the
271 students enrolled in the course.
272 (8) The department of elementary and secondary
273 education shall monitor the aggregate performance of

SB 992 36
274 providers and make such information available to the public
275 under subsection 11 of this section.
276 (9) Pursuant to rules to be promulgated by the
277 department of elementary and secondary education, when a
278 student transfers into a school district or charter school,
279 credits previously gained through successful passage of
280 approved courses under the Missouri course access and
281 virtual school program shall be accepted by the school
282 district or charter school.
283 (10) Pursuant to rules to be promulgated by the
284 department of elementary and secondary education, if a
285 student transfers into a school district or charter school
286 while enrolled in a Missouri course access and virtual
287 school program course or full-time virtual school, the
288 student shall continue to be enrolled in such course or
289 school.
290 (11) Nothing in this section shall prohibit home
291 school or FPE school students, private school students, or
292 students wishing to take additional courses beyond their
293 regular course load from enrolling in Missouri course access
294 and virtual school program courses under an agreement that
295 includes terms for paying tuition or course fees.
296 (12) Nothing in this subsection shall require any
297 school district, charter school, virtual program, or the
298 state to provide computers, equipment, or internet access to
299 any student unless required under the education services
300 plan created for an eligible student under subdivision (4)
301 of this subsection or for an eligible student with a
302 disability to comply with federal law. An education
303 services plan may require an eligible student to have access
304 to school facilities of the resident school district during
305 regular school hours for participation and instructional

SB 992 37
306 activities of a virtual program under this section, and the
307 education services plan shall provide for reimbursement of
308 the resident school district for such access pursuant to
309 rules adopted by the department under this section.
310 (13) The authorization process shall provide for
311 continuous monitoring of approved providers and courses.
312 The department shall revoke or suspend or take other
313 corrective action regarding the authorization of any course
314 or provider no longer meeting the requirements of the
315 program. Unless immediate action is necessary, prior to
316 revocation or suspension, the department shall notify the
317 provider and give the provider a reasonable time period to
318 take corrective action to avoid revocation or suspension.
319 The process shall provide for periodic renewal of
320 authorization no less frequently than once every three years.
321 (14) Courses approved as of August 28, 2018, by the
322 department to participate in the Missouri virtual
323 instruction program shall be automatically approved to
324 participate in the Missouri course access and virtual school
325 program, but shall be subject to periodic renewal.
326 (15) Any online course or virtual program offered by a
327 school district or charter school, including those offered
328 prior to August 28, 2018, which meets the requirements of
329 section 162.1250 shall be automatically approved to
330 participate in the Missouri course access and virtual school
331 program. Such course or program shall be subject to
332 periodic renewal. A school district or charter school
333 offering such a course or virtual school program shall be
334 deemed an approved provider.
335 (16) A host district may contract with a provider to
336 perform any required services involved with delivering a
337 full-time virtual education.

SB 992 38
338 4. (1) As used in this subsection, the term
339 "instructional activities" means classroom-based or
340 nonclassroom-based activities that a student shall be
341 expected to complete, participate in, or attend during any
342 given school day, such as:
343 (a) Online logins to curricula or programs;
344 (b) Offline activities;
345 (c) Completed assignments within a particular program,
346 curriculum, or class;
347 (d) Testing;
348 (e) Face-to-face communications or meetings with
349 school staff;
350 (f) Telephone or video conferences with school staff;
351 (g) School-sanctioned field trips; or
352 (h) Orientation.
353 (2) A full-time virtual school shall submit a
354 notification to the parent or guardian of any student who is
355 not consistently engaged in instructional activities and
356 shall provide regular student progress reports for each
357 student at least four times per school year.
358 (3) Each full-time virtual school shall develop,
359 adopt, and post on the school's website a policy setting
360 forth the consequences for a student who fails to complete
361 the required instructional activities. Such policy shall
362 state, at a minimum, that if a student fails to complete the
363 instructional activities after receiving a notification
364 under subdivision (2) of this subsection, and after
365 reasonable intervention strategies have been implemented,
366 that the student shall be subject to certain consequences
367 which may include disenrollment from the school. Prior to
368 any disenrollment, the parent or guardian shall have the
369 opportunity to present any information that the parent deems

SB 992 39
370 relevant, and such information shall be considered prior to
371 any final decision.
372 (4) If a full-time virtual school disenrolls a student
373 under subdivision (3) of this subsection, the school shall
374 immediately provide written notification to such student's
375 school district of residence. The student's school district
376 of residence shall then provide to the parents or guardian
377 of the student a written list of available educational
378 options and promptly enroll the student in the selected
379 option. Any student disenrolled from a full-time virtual
380 school shall be prohibited from reenrolling in the same
381 virtual school for the remainder of the school year.
382 5. School districts or charter schools shall inform
383 parents of their child's right to participate in the
384 program. Availability of the program shall be made clear in
385 the parent handbook, registration documents, and featured on
386 the home page of the school district or charter school's
387 website.
388 6. The department shall:
389 (1) Establish an authorization process for course or
390 full-time virtual school providers that includes multiple
391 opportunities for submission each year;
392 (2) Pursuant to the time line established by the
393 department, authorize course or full-time virtual school
394 providers that:
395 (a) Submit all necessary information pursuant to the
396 requirements of the process; and
397 (b) Meet the criteria described in subdivision (3) of
398 this subsection;
399 (3) Review, pursuant to the authorization process,
400 proposals from providers to provide a comprehensive, full-
401 time equivalent course of study for students through the

SB 992 40
402 Missouri course access and virtual school program. The
403 department shall ensure that these comprehensive courses of
404 study align to state academic standards and that there is
405 consistency and compatibility in the curriculum used by all
406 providers from one grade level to the next grade level;
407 (4) Within thirty days of any denial, provide a
408 written explanation to any course or full-time virtual
409 school providers that are denied authorization;
410 (5) Allow a course or full-time virtual school
411 provider denied authorization to reapply at any point in the
412 future.
413 7. The department shall publish the process
414 established under this section, including any deadlines and
415 any guidelines applicable to the submission and
416 authorization process for course or full-time virtual school
417 providers on its website.
418 8. If the department determines that there are
419 insufficient funds available for evaluating and authorizing
420 course or full-time virtual school providers, the department
421 may charge applicant course or full-time virtual school
422 providers a fee up to, but no greater than, the amount of
423 the costs in order to ensure that evaluation occurs. The
424 department shall establish and publish a fee schedule for
425 purposes of this subsection.
426 9. Except as specified in this section and as may be
427 specified by rule of the state board of education, the
428 Missouri course access and virtual school program shall
429 comply with all state laws and regulations applicable to
430 school districts, including but not limited to the Missouri
431 school improvement program (MSIP), annual performance report
432 (APR), teacher certification, curriculum standards, audit
433 requirements under chapter 165, access to public records

SB 992 41
434 under chapter 610, and school accountability report cards
435 under section 160.522. Teachers and administrators employed
436 by a virtual provider shall be considered to be employed in
437 a public school for all certification purposes under chapter
438 168.
439 10. The department shall submit and publicly publish
440 an annual report on the Missouri course access and virtual
441 school program and the participation of entities to the
442 governor, the chair and ranking member of the senate
443 education committee, and the chair and ranking member of the
444 house of representatives elementary and secondary education
445 committee. The report shall at a minimum include the
446 following information:
447 (1) The annual number of unique students participating
448 in courses authorized under this section and the total
449 number of courses in which students are enrolled in;
450 (2) The number of authorized providers;
451 (3) The number of authorized courses and the number of
452 students enrolled in each course;
453 (4) The number of courses available by subject and
454 grade level;
455 (5) The number of students enrolled in courses broken
456 down by subject and grade level;
457 (6) Student outcome data, including completion rates,
458 student learning gains, student performance on state or
459 nationally accepted assessments, by subject and grade level
460 per provider. This outcome data shall be published in a
461 manner that protects student privacy;
462 (7) The costs per course;
463 (8) Evaluation of in-school course availability
464 compared to course access availability to ensure gaps in
465 course access are being addressed statewide.

SB 992 42
466 11. (1) The department shall be responsible for
467 creating the Missouri course access and virtual school
468 program catalog providing a listing of all courses
469 authorized and available to students in the state, detailed
470 information, including costs per course, about the courses
471 to inform student enrollment decisions, and the ability for
472 students to submit their course enrollments.
473 (2) On or before January 1, 2023, the department shall
474 publish on its website, and distribute to all school
475 districts and charter schools in this state, a guidance
476 document that details the options for virtual course access
477 and full-time virtual course access for all students in the
478 state. The guidance document shall include a complete and
479 readily understood description of the applicable enrollment
480 processes including the opportunity for students to enroll
481 and the roles and responsibilities of the student, parent,
482 virtual provider, school district or districts, and charter
483 schools, as appropriate. The guidance document shall be
484 distributed in written and electronic form to all school
485 districts, charter schools, and virtual providers. School
486 districts and charter schools shall provide a copy of the
487 guidance document to every pupil and parent or legal
488 guardian of every pupil enrolled in the district or charter
489 school at the beginning of each school year and upon
490 enrollment for every pupil enrolling at a different time of
491 the school year. School districts and charter schools shall
492 provide a readily viewable link to the electronic version of
493 the guidance document on the main page of the district's or
494 charter school's website.
495 12. Any virtual school or program may administer any
496 [statewide] nationally norm-referenced assessment required
497 pursuant to the provisions of section 160.518, except for

SB 992 43
498 college readiness or workforce readiness assessments
499 provided by a national college and career readiness
500 assessment provider, in a virtual setting that aligns with
501 the student's regular academic instruction. Any
502 administration of a virtual [statewide] assessment shall
503 meet the following conditions:
504 (1) The assessment shall be administered to the
505 student at an assigned date and time;
506 (2) The assessment shall be administered during a
507 synchronous assessment session initiated and managed by an
508 employee of the virtual school;
509 (3) The student shall be monitored by an assessment
510 proctor via a camera for the duration of the assessment. If
511 the assessment platform does not allow for integrated camera
512 proctoring, the student shall use two devices during the
513 assessment. The first device shall be used to take the
514 assessment and the second device shall have a functioning
515 camera and be used to monitor the student during the
516 assessment. However, if the assessment platform allows for
517 the proctor to view the student and background, then a
518 second device shall not be required;
519 (4) The virtual school or program shall make every
520 reasonable effort to maintain a student assessment taker to
521 assessment proctor ratio of ten to one or lower;
522 (5) The student shall not exit the assessment platform
523 until instructed to do so by the assigned assessment
524 proctor; and
525 (6) The student's submission of the completed
526 assessment shall be verified by the assessment administrator.
527 13. The state board of education through the
528 rulemaking process and the department of elementary and
529 secondary education in its policies and procedures shall

SB 992 44
530 ensure that multiple content providers and learning
531 management systems are allowed, ensure digital content
532 conforms to accessibility requirements, provide an easily
533 accessible link for providers to submit courses or full-time
534 virtual schools on the Missouri course access and virtual
535 school program website, and allow any person, organization,
536 or entity to submit courses or full-time virtual schools for
537 approval. No content provider shall be allowed that is
538 unwilling to accept payments in the amount and manner as
539 described under subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of this
540 section or does not meet performance or quality standards
541 adopted by the state board of education.
542 14. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
543 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
544 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
545 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
546 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
547 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
548 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
549 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
550 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
551 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
552 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
553 2006, shall be invalid and void.
161.855. 1. By October 1, 2014, the state board of
education shall convene work groups composed of education
professionals to develop and recommend academic performance
standards. The work groups shall be composed of individuals
as provided in section 160.514. The state board of
education and the work groups shall follow the procedures
and conduct the public hearings required by section
160.514. The state board of education shall convene

SB 992 45
separate work groups for the following subject areas:
English language arts; mathematics; science; and history and
governments. For each of these four subject areas, the
state board of education shall convene two separate work
groups, one work group for grades kindergarten through five
and another work group for grades six through twelve.
2. The work groups shall develop and recommend
academic performance standards to the state board of
education by October 1, 2015. The work groups shall report
on their progress in developing the academic performance
standards to the president pro tempore of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives on a monthly basis.
3. The state board of education shall adopt and
implement academic performance standards beginning in the
2016-17 school year. [The state board of education shall
align the statewide assessment system to the academic
performance standards as needed.
4. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall pilot assessments from the Smarter Balanced
Assessment Consortium during the 2014-15 school year.
Notwithstanding any rules adopted by the state board of
education or the department of elementary and secondary
education in place on August 28, 2014, for the 2014-15
school year, and at any time the state board of education or
the department of elementary and secondary education
implements a new statewide assessment system, develops new
academic performance standards, or makes changes to the
Missouri school improvement program, the first year of such
statewide assessment system and performance indicators shall
be utilized as a pilot year for the purposes of calculating
a district's annual performance report under the Missouri
school improvement program. The results of a statewide

SB 992 46
pilot shall not be used to lower a public school district's
accreditation or for a teacher's evaluation.
5.] 4. Any person performing work for a school
district or charter school for which teacher certification
or administrator certification is regularly required under
the laws relating to the certification of teachers or
administrators shall be an employee of the school district
or charter school. All evaluations of any such person shall
be maintained in the teacher's or administrator's personnel
file and shall not be shared with any state or federal
agency.
161.1085. For purposes of sections 161.1080 to
161.1130, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of elementary and
secondary education;
(2) "Governing board", the board of education of a
district or the governing board of a charter school that has
declared itself a local educational agency;
(3) "Initial remedial year", the year in which a
district school or charter school is designated as a school
in need of intervention under section 161.1090;
(4) "Local educational agency", any school district
and any charter school that has declared itself a local
educational agency;
(5) "Nationally norm-referenced assessment", any test
of student achievement in English language arts,
mathematics, or science, including any such test
administered in a computer-adaptive format, that is
administered under section 160.518;
(6) "School", a public school under the control of a
local educational agency;

SB 992 47
[(6)] (7) "School in need of intervention", a school
that has been designated as in need of intervention by the
department according to an outcome-based measure as
determined by the department under section 161.1090, which
may include, but shall not be required to include, schools
identified for intervention under the state's every student
succeeds act plan[;
(7) "Statewide assessment", any test of student
achievement in English language arts, mathematics, or
science, including any such test administered in a computer-
adaptive format, that is administered statewide under
section 160.518].
161.1090. 1. Subject to appropriation, the department
shall establish a school turnaround program to assist
schools designated by the department as in need of
intervention in accordance with the provisions of sections
161.1080 to 161.1130.
2. The department shall use an outcome-based measure
to set criteria for the designation of schools in need of
intervention.
3. No more than one month after [statewide] nationally
norm-referenced assessment results are made public, the
department shall designate specific schools as in need of
intervention. The department shall designate a school as in
need of intervention only if sufficient funds are available
in the school turnaround fund established in section
161.1105 to pay an independent school turnaround expert.
4. The department shall determine the specific
criteria that a school shall be required to meet in order to
exit the school turnaround program based on the same outcome-
based measure that was used to designate the school as in
need of intervention.

SB 992 48
5. The department shall not designate any school as in
need of intervention before September 1, 2020.
6. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the criteria
established under this section from satisfying a school's
requirement for intervention under the every student
succeeds act.
161.1100. 1. Before August 30, 2020, the department
shall identify two or more approved independent school
turnaround experts, through a request for proposals process,
that a school in need of intervention may select from to
partner with, to:
(1) Collect and analyze data on the school's student
achievement, personnel, culture, curriculum, assessments,
instructional practices, digital tools and other methods for
teaching and learning, governance, leadership, finances, and
policies;
(2) Recommend changes to the school's culture,
curriculum, assessments, instructional practices,
governance, finances, policies, or other areas based on data
collected under subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(3) Develop and implement, in partnership with the
school turnaround committee, a school turnaround plan that
meets the criteria described in section 161.1095;
(4) Monitor the effectiveness of a school turnaround
plan through reliable means of evaluation including, but not
limited to, onsite visits, observations, surveys, analysis
of student achievement data, and interviews;
(5) Provide ongoing implementation support and project
management for a school turnaround plan;
(6) Provide high-quality professional development and
coaching personalized for school staff that is designed to
build:

SB 992 49
(a) The leadership capacity of the school principal;
(b) The instructional capacity of school staff; and
(c) The collaborative practices of teacher and
leadership teams;
(7) Provide job-embedded professional learning and
coaching for all instructional staff on a weekly basis, at a
minimum;
(8) Provide job-embedded professional learning and
coaching for the school principal at least twice monthly,
focused on proven strategies to turn around schools in need
of intervention that are aligned with administrator
standards developed under section 168.410; and
(9) Leverage support from community partners to
coordinate an efficient delivery of supports to students
both inside and outside the classroom.
2. In identifying independent school turnaround
experts under subsection 1 of this section, the department
shall identify experts who:
(1) Have a credible track record of improving student
academic achievement in public schools with various
demographic characteristics, as measured by [statewide]
nationally norm-referenced assessments;
(2) Have experience designing, implementing, and
evaluating data-driven instructional systems in public
schools;
(3) Have experience coaching public school
administrators and teachers on designing and implementing
data-driven school improvement plans;
(4) Have experience collaborating with the various
education entities that govern public schools;

SB 992 50
(5) Have experience delivering high-quality
professional development and coaching in instructional
effectiveness to public school administrators and teachers;
(6) Are willing to be compensated for professional
services based on performance as described in section
161.1105; and
(7) Are willing to partner with any school in need of
intervention in the state, regardless of location.
162.1300. If a change in school district boundary
lines occurs under section 162.223, 162.431, 162.441, or
162.451, or by action of the state board of education under
section 162.081, including attachment of a school district's
territory to another district or dissolution, such that a
school district receives additional students as a result of
such change, the [statewide] nationally norm-referenced
assessment scores and all other performance data for those
students whom the district received shall not be used for
three years when calculating the performance of the
receiving district for three school years for purposes of
the Missouri school improvement program.
163.023. 1. Commencing September 1, 1997, a school
district that has an operating levy for school purposes as
defined in section 163.011, of less than the minimum value
required by section 163.021, shall be classified as
unaccredited by the state board of education and shall be
deemed to be an unclassified school district for all
purposes under force of law, pursuant to the authority of
the state board of education to classify school districts
pursuant to section 161.092, except that no school district
shall be classified as unaccredited or deemed to be an
unclassified school district pursuant to this section if
such district is ineligible to receive state aid under

SB 992 51
section 163.031, exclusive of categorical add-ons, because
the district's local effort is greater than its weighted
average daily attendance multiplied by the state adequacy
target multiplied by the dollar value modifier. No school
district, except a district which is ineligible to receive
state aid under section 163.031, exclusive of categorical
add-ons, because the district's local effort is greater than
its weighted average daily attendance multiplied by the
state adequacy target multiplied by the dollar value
modifier, may be classified or reclassified as accredited
until such district has an operating levy for school
purposes which is equal to or greater than the minimum value
required by section 163.021. Beginning July 1, 1998, the
state board of education shall consider the results for a
school district from the [statewide assessment system
developed] nationally norm-referenced assessments conducted
pursuant to the provisions of section 160.518 when
classifying a school district as authorized by subdivision
(9) of section 161.092. Further, the state board of
education shall consider the condition and adequacy of
facilities of a school district when determining such
classification.
2. For any school district classified unaccredited for
any school year, the state board of education shall conduct
procedures to classify said school district for the first
school year following.
167.905. 1. By July 1, 2018, each school district
shall develop a policy and implement a measurable system for
identifying students in their ninth grade year, or students
who transfer into the school subsequent to their ninth grade
year, who are at risk of not being ready for college-level
work or for entry-level career positions. Districts shall

SB 992 52
include, but are not limited to, the following sources of
information:
(1) A student's performance on [the Missouri
assessment program test] a nationally norm-referenced
assessment in eighth grade in English language arts and
mathematics;
(2) A student's comparable statewide assessment
performance if such student transferred from another state;
(3) The district's overall reported remediation rate
under section 173.750; and
(4) A student's attendance rate.
2. The district policy shall require academic and
career counseling to take place prior to graduation so that
the school may attempt to provide sufficient opportunities
to the student to graduate college-ready or career-ready and
on time.
3. Each school district shall adopt a policy to permit
the waiver of the requirements of this section for any
student with a disability if recommended by the student's
IEP committee. For purposes of this subsection, "IEP" means
individualized education program.
168.749. 1. Beginning with school year 2010-11,
teachers who elect to participate in the teacher choice
compensation package shall be eligible for stipends based on
the following criteria:
(1) Score on a value-added test instrument or
instruments. Such instruments shall be defined as those
which give a reliable measurement of the skills and
knowledge transferred to students during the time they are
in a teacher's classroom and shall be selected by the school
district from one or more of the following assessments:

SB 992 53
(a) A list of recognized value-added instruments
developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education;
(b) Scores on the [statewide] assessments
[established] conducted under section 160.518 may be used
for this purpose, and the department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop a procedure for
identifying the value added by teachers that addresses the
fact that not all subjects are necessarily tested at all
grade levels each year [under the state assessment program];
(c) Scores on annual tests required by the federal
Elementary and Secondary Education Act reauthorization of
2002 for third through eighth grade may be used as value-
added instruments if found appropriate after consideration
and approval by the state board of education;
(d) A district may choose an instrument after a public
hearing of the district board of education on the matter,
with the reasons for the selection entered upon the minutes
of the meeting; provided, however, that this option shall
not be available to districts after scores are established
for paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subdivision;
(2) Evaluations by principals or other administrators
with expertise to evaluate classroom performance;
(3) Evaluations by parents and by students at their
appropriate developmental level.
Model instruments for these evaluations shall be developed
or identified by the department of elementary and secondary
education. Districts may use such models, may use other
existing models, or may develop their own instruments. A
district that develops its own instrument shall not use that
instrument as its sole method of evaluation.

SB 992 54
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop criteria for determining eligibility
for stipend increments, including a range of target scores
on assessments for use by the districts. The test-score
options listed in subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this
section shall be given higher weight than the evaluation
options listed in subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection 1
of this section. The decision of individual districts about
the qualifications for each increment based on the
evaluations listed in subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection
1 of this section and for value-added instruments for which
target scores have not been developed by the department of
elementary and secondary education may address the
district's unique characteristics but shall require
demonstrably superior performance on the part of the
teacher, based primarily on improved student achievement
while taking into account classroom demographics including
but not limited to students' abilities, special needs, and
class size.
170.017. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall, by July 1, 2015, develop a high school
graduation policy that allows a student to fulfill one unit
of academic credit with a district-approved agriculture or
career and technical education course for any communication
arts, mathematics, science, or social studies unit required
for high school graduation in any combination up to
fulfilling one requirement in each of the four subject
areas. [The substitution may not be made where the course
for which the agriculture or career and technical education
course is being substituted requires an end-of-course
statewide assessment. The credit cannot be substituted for
any course which requires a statewide end-of-course

SB 992 55
assessment.] The policy required under this section shall
be in addition to the optional waiver of one unit of
academic credit for a three-unit career and technical
program of studies.
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective only upon notification to the revisor of statutes
by an opinion by the attorney general of Missouri, a
proclamation by the governor of Missouri, or the adoption of
a concurrent resolution by the Missouri general assembly
that the United States Department of Education has been
abolished or dismantled by an act of the United States
Congress.
✓